Vermont, session 2025-2026, S67.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
Consistent with the declaration of policy on minimum wages, set forth in 21
V.S.A. § 381, and to address ongoing concerns about affordability, it is the
General Assembly’s intent to raise the State minimum wage to the livable
wage as reported by the Joint Fiscal Office in January 2025. Future increases
to the minimum wage will continue to be determined as established by current
law.
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 383 is amended to read:
§ 383. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
VT LEG #379237 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.67
2025 Page 2 of 2
* * *
(5) “Livable wage” means the average of the urban and rural hourly
wage required for a full-time worker who lives in shared housing and has
employer-assisted health insurance to pay for the basic needs budget.
Sec. 3. 21 V.S.A. § 384 is amended to read:
§ 384. EMPLOYMENT; WAGES
(a)(1) Beginning on January 1, 2022 2026, an employer shall not employ
any employee at a rate of less than $12.55, and on the livable wage of $18.60.
On each subsequent January 1, the minimum wage rate shall be increased by
five percent or the percentage increase of the Consumer Price Index, CPI-U,
U.S. city average, not seasonally adjusted, or successor index, as calculated by
the U.S. Department of Labor or successor agency for the 12 months preceding
the previous September 1, whichever is smaller, but in no event shall the
minimum wage be decreased. The minimum wage shall be rounded off to the
nearest $0.01.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379237 v.1